Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.025

Fees—Director's discretion.

The director may, consistent with the requirements for banks under *Title 30 RCW, collect from an applicant or business development company, as applicable, application fees, application review fees, periodic examination fees, and similar fees and charges, as may be reasonable for the safe and sound regulation and promotion of business development companies under this chapter.

[ 2006 c 87 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Title 30 RCW was recodified and/or repealed pursuant to 2014 c 37, effective January 5, 2015.